Maryland, session 2026, SB0013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
3–108.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a license holder is not
entitled to a refund of the unearned portion of the license fee.
(b) A refund shall be issued to a license holder on surrender of the license if:
(1) receivership or bankruptcy of the business entity on whose behalf the
license was issued occurs and a license transfer is not requested, with the refund issued for
the benefit of the creditors of the license holder;
(2) the license holder dies, with the refund issued for the benefit of the
estate of the deceased license holder;
(3) the license holder volunteers for or has been called into the [armed
forces of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES or the organized State militia;
(4) the license holder surrenders a license and obtains a new license of
another class carrying a higher fee, with the refund deducted from the higher fee;
– 1 –

Ch. 863 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(5) the license holder, against whom charges are pending when the license
is renewed, is found guilty and the license is revoked, with the refund issued to the license
holder in an amount based on the date that the revocation becomes final;
(6) the issuance of a license by the Executive Director is reversed on
judicial review and the operation of the establishment is prohibited, with the refund issued
to the license holder in an amount based on the date that the refusal to grant the renewal
becomes final; or
(7) the licensed premises is taken by the federal government, the State, or
a municipality for public use.
4–113.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a license holder is not
entitled to a refund of the unearned portion of the license fee.
(b) A refund shall be issued to a license holder on surrender of the license if:
(1) receivership or bankruptcy of the business entity on whose behalf the
license was issued occurs and a license transfer is not requested, with the refund issued for
the benefit of the creditors of the license holder;
(2) the license holder dies, with the refund issued for the benefit of the
estate of the deceased license holder;
(3) the license holder volunteers for or has been called into the [armed
forces of the United States] UNIFORMED SERVICES or the organized State militia;
(4) the license holder surrenders a license and obtains a new license of
another class carrying a higher fee, with the refund deducted from the higher fee;
(5) a license holder, against whom charges are pending when the license is
renewed, is found guilty and the license is revoked, with the refund issued to the license
holder in an amount based on the date that the revocation becomes final;
(6) the issuance of a license by a local licensing board is reversed on judicial
review and the operation of the establishment is prohibited, with the refund issued to the
license holder in an amount based on the date that the refusal to grant the renewal becomes
final; or
(7) the licensed premises are taken by the federal government, the State,
or a municipality for public use.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 863
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 3 –